North Carolina, session 2025, SB809.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 160A-58.1(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) A noncontiguous area proposed for annexation must meet all of the following
standards:
…
(5) The area within the proposed satellite corporate limits, when added to the area
within all other satellite corporate limits, may not exceed ten percent (10%)
of the area within the primary corporate limits of the annexing city.
This subdivision does not apply to the Cities of Archdale, Asheboro,
Belmont, Claremont, Concord, Conover, Dunn, Durham, Elizabeth City,
Gastonia, Greenville, Hickory, Kannapolis, King, Kings Mountain, Locust,
Lowell, Marion, Mount Airy, Mount Holly, New Bern, Newton, Oxford,
Randleman, Roanoke Rapids, Rockingham, Saluda, Sanford, Salisbury,
Shelby, Southport, Statesville, and Washington and the Towns of Ahoskie,
Angier, Apex, Ayden, Belville, Benson, Bladenboro, Bridgeton, Bunn,
Burgaw, Calabash, Carthage, Catawba, China Grove, Clayton, Cleveland,
Coats, Columbia, Columbus, Cramerton, Creswell, Dallas, Dobson, Erwin,
Four Oaks, Franklin, Franklinton, Franklinville, Fuquay-Varina, Garner,
Godwin, Goldston, Granite Quarry, Green Level, Grimesland, Harrisburg,
Holly Ridge, Holly Springs, Hookerton, Hope Mills, Huntersville,
Jamestown, Kenansville, Kenly, Knightdale, Landis, Laurel Park, Liberty,
Lillington, Louisburg, Madison, Maggie Valley, Maiden, Mayodan,
Maysville, Middlesex, Midland, Mocksville, Morrisville, Mount Pleasant,
Nashville, North Wilkesboro, Norwood, Oak Island, Oakboro, Ocean Isle
Beach, Pembroke, Pine Level, Pollocksville, Princeton, Ramseur, Ranlo,
Richlands, Rockwell, Rolesville, Rutherfordton, Shallotte, Siler City,
Smithfield, Spencer, Spring Lake, Spruce Pine, Stanley, Stem, Stovall, Surf
City, Swansboro, Taylorsville, Troutman, Troy, Vass, Wallace, Warsaw,
Watha, Waynesville, Weldon, Wendell, West Jefferson, Wilson's Mills,
Windsor, Wingate, Yadkinville, Youngsville, and Zebulon."
SECTION 2.(a) The corporate limits of the Town of Rural Hall are hereby removed
from the Forsyth County Countywide Fire Service District.
SECTION 2.(b) This section has no effect upon the validity of any liens of Forsyth
County for ad valorem taxes outstanding before the effective date of this section.
SECTION 2.(c) This section becomes effective June 30, 2026. Property in the
territory described in this section as of January 1, 2026, is no longer subject to Forsyth County
*S809-v-5*

Countywide Fire Service District taxes for taxes imposed for taxable years beginning on or after
July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
In the General Assembly read three times and ratified this the 24th day of June, 2026.
s/ Rachel Hunt
President of the Senate
s/ Mitchell S. Setzer
Speaker Pro Tempore of the House of
Representatives
Page 2 Session Law 2026-17 Senate Bill 809